Utah statutes.
6-1-14.   Subsequent inventory -- Additional bond.
The assignee shall from time to time file with the clerk of the court an
inventory and valuation of any additional property which may come into his
hands under the assignment after the filing of the first inventory, and the
clerk or the judge of the court may thereupon require him to give additional
security.
